Washington statutes.
RCW 1.70.070

Public access to legal material in official electronic record.

An official publisher of legal material in an electronic record that is required to be preserved under RCW 1.70.060 shall ensure that the material is reasonably available for use by the public on a permanent basis.

[ 2017 c 106 s 8.]